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DTC P 1115/23AtmosphericTemperatureCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The atmospheric temperature sensor is built into the intake
manifold and senses the atmospheric temperature. A thermis-
tor built in the sensor changes the resistance value according
to the intake air temperature. The lower the atmospheric tem-
perature, the greater the thermistor resistance value, and the
higher the atmospheric temperature, the lower the thermistor
resistance value (See Fig. 1).
The atmospheric temperature sensor is connected to the en-
gine ECU. The 5 V power source voltage in the engine ECU is
applied to the atmospheric temperature sensor from terminal
THA via a resistor R. That is, the resistor R and the atmospheric
temperature sensor are connected in series. When the resis-
tance value of the atmospheric temperature sensor changes,
according to changes in the atmospheric temperature, the volt-
age at terminal THA also varies. Based on this signal, the en-
gine ECU increases the fuel injection volume to improve drive-

abilityduringcoldengineoperation.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1115/23
Open or short in atmospheric temp. sensor circuit for 0.5 sec.
or more

SOpenorshort inatmospheric temp.sensorcircuit
SAtmospheric temp.sensor
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-

neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
S Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester II. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the
malfunction occurred.

1 Check voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals THA and E2 of the en-
gine ECU connector.
OK:

Intake Air Temp. Voltage

20˚  C (68˚  F) (Engine is cool) 0.2 to 3.8 V

80˚  C (176˚  F) (Engine is hot) 0.1 to 1.5 V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG

2Checkatmosphereric temperaturesensor (SeePub.No.RM6 17EonpageED −7).

NG Replace atmosphereric temperature sensor.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
atmosphereric temperature sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


